Utah statutes.
58-1-107.   Applicability -- Relationship to specific chapters under title.

The provisions of this chapter uniformly apply to the administration and enforcement of this title.  However, unless expressly prohibited in this chapter, any provision of this chapter may be supplemented or altered by specific chapters of this title.

